District of Columbia statutes.
7-837

Committee on Metabolic Disorders — Annual report to Mayor and Council.

The Committee shall submit to the Mayor and the Council on January 1st of each year a report summarizing the activities of the Committee, and containing any recommendations to the Mayor and the Council which the Committee deems necessary regarding problems of metabolic disorders.

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 8, 27 DCR 1087
1981 Ed., § 6-317.